src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
LEXICON LAKTÅVSSÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords ending on -ose in nrowegian and -os in swedish, with long and short compound form. Assimilated to smj as -åvsså. The old stadarization -oga that does not follow lulesami rules is sub taged.

* pedagoga # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *laktåvsså:* `laktåvsså+N+Sg+Nom`
* *laktåvsås:* `laktåvsså+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON FAKTÅVRRÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -åvrrå with long and short compound-form.

LEXICON MIKROSKÅVPPÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -åvppå (-op in NOB/SWE) with long and short compound-form.  Long vowel and short consonant is assimilated with njuoban, but somehow a lot of -op words are assimilated -oahppa (biskop is pronounced as -opp, so that's different, maybe some have used "biskop" as template), so this is Err/Orth taged. 

* oajvvekontåvrrå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *oajvvekontåvrrå:* `oajvvekontåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *oajvvekontåvrås:* `oajvvekontåvrrå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON KULTUVRRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -vrra with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* muvrra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *muvrra:* `muvrra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *muvrajn:* `muvrra+N+Sg+Com`

LEXICON TERAPÆVTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ævtta/ievtta with long and short compound-form. No -lasj derivation. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* muvrra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *terapævtta:* `terapævtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *terapävtta:* `terapævtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *terapievtta:* `terapævtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *terapevtajn:* `terapævtta+N+Sg+Com`
* *terapievtajn:* `terapævtta+N+Sg+Com`

LEXICON ADVÆRBBA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ærbba with long and short compound-form

* detransitijvvaværbba # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *detransitijvvaværbba:* `detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Nom`
* *detransitijvvavärbba:* `detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Nom`
* *detransitijvvaverbas:* `detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SUBSTÁNSSA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ánssa with long and short compound-form. Originally -ans in SWE and NOR. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* instánssa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *instánssa:* `instánssa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *instánsas:* `instánssa+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON VALÆNSSA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ænssa with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* intelligænssa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *intelligænssa:* `intelligænssa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *intelligänssa:* `intelligænssa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *intelligensav:* `intelligænssa+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON ADVOKÁHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -áhtta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* klimáhtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *klimáhtta:* `klimáhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *klimáhtas:* `klimáhtta+N+Sg+Ela`

 LEXICON ALFABIEHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords originally on -et both in Norway and Sweden. Assimilation differences, however, create two lule sami forms: -iehtta in NOR and -æhtta in SWE. LONG -e is assimilated in different ways in Norway and Sweden: In Norway, it becomes -ie, and in Sweden -e. Tiedja/tedja, systiebma/systebma and so on. This is especially apparent in assimilated words with long e in third grade: E becomes æ in third grade so we get "universitæhtta" in SWE, but this is very strange to people on the norwegian side of the border as they want "universitiehtta". Both -ie and -e are dialtaged in lexicons HYDROGIEDNA, APOTIEHKKA, SYSTIEBMA, KAFÉ. Previously people often wrote -ehtta in Norway, but this is incorrect as e always becomes æ in grade three.

* mobilitiehtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *mobilitähtta:* `mobilitiehtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *mobilitiehtta:* `mobilitiehtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *mobilitehtav:* `mobilitiehtta+N+Sg+Acc`
* *mobilitiehtav:* `mobilitiehtta+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON INTERNÆHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -æhtta with long and short compound-form: -ET IN SWEDISH, -ETT in norwegian. Differs from ALFABIEHTTA because -ehtta isn't used in NOR.

* intranæhtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *intranæhtta:* `intranæhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *intranähtta:* `intranæhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *intranehtas:* `intranæhtta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TABLÆHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -æhtta with long and short compound-form. -ETT in both norwegian and in swedish.

* kvartæhtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *kvartæhtta:* `kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kvartähtta:* `kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kvartehtas:* `kvartæhtta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON INSTITUHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -uhtta, with long and short compound-form on -utt(NOR)/-ut(SWE). The swedish -ut also gets uvtta, as ANTIHKKA-antijkka, but instituhtta is also used in sweden, so no Area/NO tag. 

* minuhtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *minuhtta:* `minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *minuvtta:* `minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *minuhtas:* `minuhtta+N+Sg+Ela`
* *minuvtas:* `minuhtta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SATELIHTTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ihtta, with long and short compound-form on -itt(NOR)/-it(SWE). The swedish -it also gets ijtta, as ANTIHKKA-antijkka, but satelihtta is also used in sweden, so no Area/NO tag. 

* inuihtta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *inuihtta:* `inuihtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *inuijtta:* `inuihtta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *inuihtas:* `inuihtta+N+Sg+Ela`
* *inuijtas:* `inuihtta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON APOTIEHKKA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -iehkka in NOR, -æhkka in SWE. -ehkka as sub. With long and short compound-form on -k. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.

old "apotehkka" (long e not allowed in grad III, even though it's in dictionaries it's wrong)

* kartotiehkka # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *kartotähkka:* `kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kartotehkas:* `kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Ela`
* *kartotiehkka:* `kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kartotiehkas:* `kartotiehkka+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ANTIHKKA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -hkka in Norway, both -ijkka and -hkka are used in Sweden (Antik vs antikk). With long and short compound-form on -kk/-k. The swedish forms were earlier added to stems for the Swedish version, but now added here.

* dialektihkka # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dialektihkka:* `dialektihkka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *dialektihkas:* `dialektihkka+N+Sg+Ela`
* *dialektijkka:* `dialektihkka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *dialektijkas:* `dialektihkka+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SEMINÁRRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -árra with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* hektárra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *hektárra:* `hektárra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *hektáras:* `hektárra+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON AREÁLLA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -álla with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* gasskavokálla # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gasskavokálla:* `gasskavokálla+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gasskavokálas:* `gasskavokálla+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON AMBASSADERRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ør with long and short compound-form. Standarized by Giellagálldo 05.05.14 as -erra. -ørra is subtaged

* observaterra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *observaterra:* `observaterra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *observateras:* `observaterra+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON VETERINERRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -erra. Words ending in -ær in both SWE and NOR. Both long and short compound-form. The old standardization form -æra, without cg, is subtaged, -also -ær'ra and -ærra.                   

LEXICON ATMOSFERRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords -on erra. But with different endings in SE and NO, ending on -ære, -ær in NOR and -är, -ära in SWE (Ingefær NO, ingefära in SE).  Only long compound-form, short form must be hardcoded in firstcompnent lexicon. The old standardization form -æra, and -era, without cg, are subtaged, -also -ær'ra and -ærra.             

* observaterra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *atmosferra:* `atmosferra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *atmosferas:* `atmosferra+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON KARAKTIERRA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords -on ierra in NOR, -erra in SWE, because of long e assimilates diffenrent ways. Words ending on -er in NOR, and -er or -är in SWE. Only long compound-form, short form must be hardcoded in firstcompnent lexicon.  

* observaterra # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *karaktierra:* `karaktierra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *karaktieras:* `karaktierra+N+Sg+Ela`
* *karakterra:* `karaktierra+N+Sg+Nom`
* *karakteras:* `karaktierra+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TABÆLLA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -älºla with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* flotælla # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *flotælla:* `flotælla+N+Sg+Nom`
* *flotälla:* `flotælla+N+Sg+Nom`
* *flotellas:* `flotælla+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TELEGRÁMMA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ámºma with long and short compound-form

* grámma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *grámma:* `grámma+N+Sg+Nom`
* *grámmas:* `grámma+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TOPOGRÁFFA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -áfºfa with long and short compound-form, no -lasj derivation since most of these words are humans. 

* telegráffa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *telegráffa:* `telegráffa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *telegráfas:* `telegráffa+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SYSTIEBMA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ebma/-iebma with long and short compound-form. -em in NOR and SWE. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* vokalsystiebma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *vokalsystebma:* `vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vokalsystiebma:* `vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vokalsystiemas:* `vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Ela`
* *vokalsystemas:* `vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ORGÁDNA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ádna with long and short compound-form

* doarjjaorgádna # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *doarjjaorgádna:* `doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Nom`
* *doarjjaorgánna:* `doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Nom`
* *doarjjaorgánav:* `doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON KOLLÆKTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ækta with long and short compound-form

* subjækta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *subjækta:* `subjækta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *subjäkta:* `subjækta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *subjevtas:* `subjækta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON HYDROGIEDNA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -iedna in NOR and -edna in SWE. Both long and short compound-form. Norwegian/swedish -en. The old standardization form -ena, without cg, is subtaged. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.

LEXICON PATÆNNTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ænnta with long and short compound-form. The -ennta form (used in "Ådå testamennta") is taged as sub (e always becomes æ in grade three).

* patænnta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *patænnta:* `patænnta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *patännta:* `patænnta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *patentas:* `patænnta+N+Sg+Ela`
